Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.260

Territorial annexation—Hearing on petition.

Upon the filing of an annexation petition with the board of park commissioners, if the commissioners concur in the petition, they shall provide for a hearing to be held for the discussion of the proposed annexation at the office of the board of park commissioners, and shall give due notice thereof by publication at least once a week for two consecutive weeks before the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the park district.

[ 1985 c 469 s 34; 1965 c 7 s 35.61.260. Prior: 1943 c 264 s 20, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6741-20, part; prior: 1907 c 98 s 20, part; RRS s 6739, part.]